Arkansas, session 2025, HB1701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 239, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 1 —— Oversight of Wastewater and Sewer Retail Providers

14-239-101. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Oversight of providers in the state is primarily handled by
the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission and the Division of Environmental
Quality;
(2) Wastewater and sewer systems need to have rates that support
capital improvement needs; and
(3) It is necessary to improve the operations and
infrastructures of wastewater and sewer systems in the state similar to the
reform of retail water providers by Acts 2021, No. 605.

14-239-102. Definitions.
*SSS110*
04-07-2025 14:38:23 SSS110

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1701
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Provider" means any public or private provider of a sewage
collection service or sewage treatment service; and
(2) "Provider's board" means the governing body of a provider,
whether the governing body is organized as a board, commission, committee,
council, or other type of entity.

14-239-103. Fiscal distress —— Improvement plans —— Rates and rate
studies —— Definition.
(a)(1) For the purposes of this section, a provider is in fiscal
distress if the provider:
(A) Fails to obtain a rate study as required under this
section;
(B) Fails to implement a completed rate study required
under this section; or
(C) Has been found by the Arkansas Natural Resources
Commission to be in significant noncompliance with rules of the commission
because of inadequate funds for operation and maintenance or inadequate
compliance with rules of the commission.
(2) A provider may be found by the commission to be subject to
this section if a member of the provider's board does not receive the
training required under § 14-239-105.
(b) The commission shall maintain and publish on the commission's
website a list of providers in fiscal distress.
(c)(1) A provider shall obtain a rate study on the following schedule:
(A) By July 1, 2028, and every five (5) years thereafter
for a provider that serves five hundred (500) or fewer customers;
(B) By July 1, 2029, and every five (5) years thereafter
for a provider that serves not less than five hundred one (501) and not more
than one thousand (1,000) customers; and
(C) By July 1, 2030, and every five (5) years thereafter
for a provider that serves more than one thousand (1,000) customers.
(2)(A) Rates and other revenue dedicated to the support of the
provider's wastewater and sewer systems shall adequately address costs for:
(i) Operation and maintenance;
(ii) Debt service;
04-07-2025 14:38:23 SSS110

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1701
(iii) Required reserves;
(iv) Depreciation;
(v) Future capital expenses;
(vi) Preparation and publication of an annual
financial report as currently required by law; and
(vii) Other expenses as necessary.
(B)(i) The rates recommended in the rate study that is
obtained and chosen by the provider shall be implemented by the provider in
the manner provided under the applicable law for modifying rates.
(ii) Except as provided in subdivision
(c)(2)(B)(iii) and (c)(2)(B)(iv) of this section, an increase in rates
recommended in the rate study shall be implemented within one (1) year of the
receipt of the rate study.
(iii) Except as provided in subdivision
(c)(2)(B)(iv) of this section, if recommended rates increase the provider's
rates by fifty percent (50%) or more from the fiscal year before the rate
study was completed, the provider may phase in the rate increase over a two-
year period.
(iv) If, through the rate study, it is recommended
that a series of rate increases be implemented over a period of time that
exceeds the periods of time required in subdivisions (c)(2)(B)(ii) and
(c)(2)(B)(iii) of this section, the provider may implement the series of rate
increases without regard to the limitations of subdivisions (c)(2)(B)(ii) and
(c)(2)(B)(iii) of this section, provided that the series of rate increases
conform with the recommendations of the rate study.
(d)(1) The commission shall determine by rule the requirements of the
rate study, including without limitation a review of the provider's
refurbishment and replacement account and asset management plan.
(2)(A) The rate study shall use as its basis the guidelines of
the American Water Works Association and the Water Environment Federation.
(B) The commission shall determine by rule an appropriate
entity to provide guidelines for the rate study to use as its basis if
guidelines of the American Water Works Association and the Water Environment
Federation are unavailable.
(e)(1) A provider shall deposit a minimum of five percent (5%) per
annum of gross revenues in a dedicated refurbishment and replacement account.
04-07-2025 14:38:23 SSS110

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1701
(2) The provider may spend any amount of the provider’s cash
savings referenced in subdivision (e)(1) of this section at any time for
refurbishment and replacement of the provider’s wastewater system facilities
and other real property.
(3) If a different amount to be deposited per annum is
determined by a rate study, then the amount determined by the rate study
shall be deposited into a dedicated refurbishment and replacement account.
(f)(1) The commission shall maintain an approved list of entities to
conduct rate studies required by this section, including without limitation
the Arkansas Rural Water Association, professional engineers, certified
public accountants, economists, and actuaries.
(2) If a provider chooses an entity to conduct the rate study
that is not on the approved list of entities, the entity shall have conducted
at least one (1) rate study in the state in the previous five-year period.
(g)(1) To ensure fiscal soundness, the commission shall consider and
approve a new provider with fewer than three hundred (300) customers within
the proposed service area only if:
(A) The commission determines that public health or the
environment is threatened without the approval of the new provider; or
(B) There is no other viable alternative.
(2) A new provider with fewer than three hundred (300) customers
seeking approval shall:
(A) Be organized through a political subdivision,
including without limitation an improvement district, a county, or a
municipality;
(B) Demonstrate the ability to remain fiscally
sustainable; and
(C) Complete a technical, financial, and managerial
capacity review conducted by the commission.
(h) A provider shall file its most recent rate study annually with
Arkansas Legislative Audit at the same time the provider files its audit
report or agreed-upon procedures and compilation report as required under §
14-234-120.
(i)(1) The commission shall annually identify and notify a provider if
the provider is in fiscal distress.
(2) The provider may appeal the finding to Pulaski County
04-07-2025 14:38:23 SSS110

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1701
Circuit Court.
(j)(1) A provider found to be in fiscal distress shall file an
improvement plan with the Division of Environmental Quality and the
commission, including without limitation specific action to be taken to
correct financial, technical, and managerial deficiencies, within ninety (90)
days of the finding of fiscal distress.
(2)(A) Upon receipt of an improvement plan under this
subsection, the division and the commission shall review the improvement plan
and:
(i) Approve the improvement plan in whole or in
part;
(ii) Modify the improvement plan; or
(iii) Deny the improvement plan.
(B) At the time the commission determines that the
provider is no longer in fiscal distress, the commission shall remove the
fiscal distress designation and notify the provider.
(k) If a provider is found to be in fiscal distress, the provider
shall not receive state financial assistance for sewage collection or sewage
treatment operations until an improvement plan that has been approved by the
commission is in place, unless the financial assistance is immediately
necessary to ensure preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, as
determined by the commission.
(l) If the provider is found to be in fiscal distress, the provider
shall obtain written authorization from the commission to:
(1) Incur additional debt;
(2) Accept assistance for the refurbishment or replacement of
facilities or construction of facilities not within the provider's
improvement plan; or
(3) Transfer assets to another entity.
14-239-104. Workforce recruitment and retention — Education.
A provider shall:
(1) Work with the Association of Arkansas Counties and the
Arkansas Municipal League to develop training for leaders of the county or
municipality that the provider serves;
(2) Provide suitable compensation and incentives to encourage
individuals to consider a career with the provider; and
04-07-2025 14:38:23 SSS110

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1701
(3) Promote the recruitment, education, and licensing of
employees of the provider.

14-239-105. Training.
(a)(1)(A) Within one (1) year of election or appointment, a majority
of the members of a provider's board shall receive a minimum of eight (8)
hours of provider training as promulgated by rule of the Arkansas Natural
Resources Commission.
(B) A member of a provider's board as of January 1, 2025,
shall receive the training required under this section by December 31, 2026.
(2) If a majority of the members of a provider's board do not
receive the training required under this section, the commission may find the
provider is subject to § 14-239-103.
(3) This section does not apply to a member of a provider's
board who has served on the provider's board for ten (10) years or more.
(b) The commission shall consult with an advisory training board for
the development of the training required under this section, whose members
shall include without limitation:
(1) The Secretary of the Department of Health or his or her
designee;
(2) The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or his
or her designee;
(3) The State Director of the United States Department of
Agriculture Rural Development in Arkansas or his or her designee;
(4) The Chief Executive Officer of the Arkansas Rural Water
Association or his or her designee;
(5) The Executive Director of the Association of Arkansas
Counties or his or her designee;
(6) The President of the Arkansas Municipal League or his or her
designee;
(7) The Chair of the Board of Directors of Communities
Unlimited, Inc., or his or her designee;
(8) The Chair of the Arkansas Water Works and Water Environment
Association, Inc., or his or her designee;
(9) The Director of the Arkansas Environmental Training Academy
or his or her designee;
04-07-2025 14:38:23 SSS110

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1701
(10) The Chair of the House Committee on City, County, and Local
Affairs;
(11) The Vice Chair of the House Committee on City, County, and
Local Affairs;
(12) The Chair of the Senate Committee on City, County, and
Local Affairs;
(13) The Vice Chair of the Senate Committee on City, County, and
Local Affairs; and
(14) The President of the Arkansas Water and Wastewater Managers
Association, Inc.

14-239-106. Applicability.
This subchapter does not apply to:
(1) A wastewater system regulated by the Arkansas Public Service
Commission as a public utility under § 23-1-101 et seq.;
(2) A municipal utility system owned or operated by a
municipality that provides electric service to retail customers in addition
to wastewater service, including without limitation an electric system:
(A) Managed or operated by a nonprofit corporation under §
14-199-701 et seq.; or
(B) Owned or operated by a municipality or by a
consolidated utility district under the General Consolidated Public Utility
System Improvement District Law, § 14-217-101 et seq.;
(3) A privately owned provider that supplies the majority of its
wastewater service to nonresidential customers;
(4) A wastewater system operated jointly between two (2)
municipalities in which each municipality is located in a different state;
(5) A provider during the time that the provider is subject to a
federal court decree or judgment for remediation efforts related to the
provider's water system or wastewater system, or both, for the purpose of
compliance with federal law; or
(6) An individual homeowner.

14-239-107. Rules.
The Arkansas Natural Resources Commission shall promulgate rules to
implement this subchapter.
04-07-2025 14:38:23 SSS110

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1701

SECTION 2. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a) When adopting the initial rules to implement this act, the
Arkansas Natural Resources Commission shall file the final rules with the
Secretary of State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(b) The commission shall file the proposed rules with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rules for approval before
January 1, 2026.

/s/Gonzales






















04-07-2025 14:38:23 SSS110